North Carolina statutes. Chapter 74C. Private Protective Services.
Article 1. Private Protective Services Board.
§ 74C-9.
Form of license; term; renewal; posting; branch offices; not assignable; late renewal fee.

The license when issued shall be in such form as may be determined by the Board and shall state:

The name of the licensee,

The name under which the licensee is to operate, and

The number and expiration date of the license.

The license shall be issued for a term of two years. A trainee permit shall be issued for a term of two years. All licenses must be renewed prior to the expiration of the term of the license. Following issuance, the license shall at all times be posted in a conspicuous place in the licensee’s principal place of business, in North Carolina, unless for good cause exempted by the Director. A license issued under this Chapter is not assignable. The Board may require all licensees to complete continuing education courses approved by the Board before renewal of their licenses.

Repealed by Session Laws 1989, c. 759, s. 7.

The operator or manager of any branch office shall be properly licensed or registered. The license shall be posted at all times in a conspicuous place in the branch office. This license shall be issued for a term of two years. Every business covered under the provisions of this Chapter shall file in writing with the Board the addresses of each of its branch offices, if any, within 10 working days after the establishment, closing, or changing of the location of any branch office. The Director may, upon the successful completion of an investigation of the application, issue a temporary branch office license pending approval of the application by the Board.

The Board is authorized to charge reasonable application and license fees as follows:

A nonrefundable initial application fee in an amount not to exceed one hundred fifty dollars ($150.00).

A new or renewal license fee in an amount not to exceed two hundred fifty dollars ($250.00) per year of the license term.

A new or renewal trainee permit fee in an amount not to exceed two hundred fifty dollars ($250.00) per year of the license term.

A new or renewal fee for each license or duplicate license in addition to the basic license referred to in subsection (2) in an amount not to exceed fifty dollars ($50.00) per year of the license term.

A late renewal fee to be paid within 90 days from the date the license, registration, permit, or certification expires in addition to the renewal fee due in an amount not to exceed one hundred dollars ($100.00), if the license, registration, permit, or certification has not been renewed on or before the expiration date of the license, registration, permit, or certification.

A new, renewal, replacement or reissuance fee for an unarmed registration identification card in an amount not to exceed thirty dollars ($30.00).

An application fee for a firearm registration permit not to exceed fifty dollars ($50.00).

A new, renewal, replacement, or reissuance fee for a firearm registration permit not to exceed thirty dollars ($30.00).

An application fee for certification as a certified trainer not to exceed fifty dollars ($50.00).

A renewal or replacement fee for certified trainer certification not to exceed twenty-five dollars ($25.00).

A new nonresident temporary permit fee not to exceed one hundred dollars ($100.00).

An unarmed registration transfer fee not to exceed fifteen dollars ($15.00).

A branch office license fee not to exceed fifty dollars ($50.00) per year of the license term.

A special limited guard and patrol license fee not to exceed one hundred dollars ($100.00) per year of the license term.

A correctable error fee not to exceed one hundred dollars ($100.00) for each subsequent filing of an application following review and rejection of the initial application.

Except as provided in G.S. 74C-13(k), all fees collected pursuant to this section shall be expended, under the direction of the Board, for the purpose of defraying the expenses of administering this Chapter.

A license or trainee permit granted under the provisions of this Chapter may be renewed by the Private Protective Services Board upon notification by the licensee or permit holder to the Director of intended renewal, the payment of the proper fee, and evidence of a policy of liability insurance as prescribed in G.S. 74C-10(e).The renewal shall be finalized before the expiration date of the license. In no event will renewal be granted more than three months after the date of expiration of a license or trainee permit.

Upon notification of approval of the application by the Board, an applicant must furnish evidence that the applicant has obtained the necessary liability insurance required by

G.S. 74C-10

and obtain the license applied for or the application shall lapse.

Trainee permits shall not be issued to applicants that qualify for a private detective license. A licensed private detective may supervise no more than five trainees at any given time.

History.

1973, c. 528, s. 1; c. 1428; 1975, c. 592, ss. 2-4; 1979, c. 818, s. 2; 1983, c. 67, s. 1; c. 794, s. 8; 1985, c. 597, ss. 1-7; 1987, c. 657, s. 3; 1989, c. 759, s. 7; 2001-487, s. 64(d); 2007-511, s. 3; 2009-328, ss. 5, 6.

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2007-511, s. 3, effective October 1, 2007, in subsection (b), substituted “two years” for “one year” in both places it appears, and added the last sentence; in subdivisions (e)(2) and (e)(3) inserted “per year of the license term”; in subdivisions (e)(7) and (e)(8) substituted “fee for a” for “fee for an armed security guard”; and in subsection (g) made stylistic changes.

Session Laws 2009-328, ss. 5 and 6, effective October 1, 2009, in subsection (d), substituted “two years” for “one year” at the end of the third sentence; and in subsection (e), made minor punctuation changes throughout; in subdivisions (e)(4), (e)(13), and (e)(14), added “per year of the license term” at the end; in subdivision (e)(5), inserted “within 90 days from the date the license, registration, permit, or certification expires” once and “registration, permit, or certification” twice; and added subdivision (e)(15).

OPINIONS OF ATTORNEY GENERAL

The Private Protective Services Board has the authority pursuant to subdivision (e)(8) to charge private investigators a full fee for an armed security guard firearm registration permit. See opinion of Attorney General to James F. Kirk, Administrator, N.C. Private Protective Services Board, 60 N.C. Op. Att'y Gen. 12 (1990).

§ 74C-10.
Certificate of liability insurance required; form and approval; suspension for noncompliance.

through (d) Repealed by Session Laws 1983, c. 673, s. 4.

(e)

No security guard and patrol, armored car, or special limited guard and patrol license shall be issued under this Chapter unless the applicant files with the Board evidence of a policy of liability insurance. The policy must provide for the following minimum coverage: fifty thousand dollars ($50,000) because of bodily injury or death of one person as a result of the negligent act or acts of the principal insured or his agents operating in the course and scope of his employment; subject to said limit for one person, one hundred thousand dollars ($100,000) because of bodily injury or death of two or more persons as the result of the negligent act or acts of the principal insured or his agents operating in the course and scope of his or her agency; twenty thousand dollars ($20,000) because of injury to or destruction of property of others as the result of the negligent act or acts of the principal insured or his agents operating in the course and scope of his or her agency. If the licensee, other than a security guard and patrol, armored car, or special limited guard and patrol licensee, carries a firearm while engaged in private protective services activities, the licensee shall obtain a policy of liability insurance with a minimum coverage as specified above. A licensee is deemed to be “carrying a firearm” for purposes of this section while engaged in private protective services if the licensee has a firearm on the licensee’s person or in the automobile the licensee is using to perform private protective services.

(f)

An insurance carrier shall have the right to cancel such policy of liability insurance upon giving a 30-day notice to the Board. Provided, however, that such cancellation shall not affect any liability on the policy which accrued prior thereto. The policy of liability shall be approved by the Board as to form, execution, and terms thereon.

(g)

The holder of any trainee permit and persons registered pursuant to

G.S. 74C-11

shall not be required to obtain a certificate of liability insurance.

(h)

Every security guard and patrol licensee, armored car licensee, special limited guard and patrol licensee, or licensee carrying a firearm while engaged in private protective services shall at all times maintain on file with the Board the certificate of insurance required by this Chapter in full force and effect and upon failure to do so, the license of such licensee shall be automatically suspended and shall not be reinstated until an application therefor, in the form prescribed by the Board, is filed together with a proper insurance certificate.No cancellation or refusal to renew by an insurer of a licensee under this Chapter shall be effective unless the insurer has given the insured licensee notice of the cancellation or refusal to renew. Upon termination of insurance coverage for said licensee, the insurer shall give notice to the Director of the Board.

(i)

The Board may deny the application notwithstanding the applicant’s compliance with this section:

For any reason which would justify refusal to issue or a suspension or revocation of a license; or

Because the applicant engaged in a private protective services profession while the applicant’s license was suspended for failure to keep the required liability insurance policy in force.

History.

1973, c. 528, s. 1; 1979, c. 818, s. 2; 1981, c. 807, ss. 4, 5; 1983, c. 673, ss. 4-6, 8; c. 794, s. 4; 1989, c. 759, s. 8; 2001-487, s. 64(e); 2007-511, ss. 4, 5.

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2007-511, ss. 4-5, effective October 1, 2007, in subsection (e), inserted “security guard and patrol, armored car, or special limited guard and patrol” in the first sentence, and added the last two sentences; and substituted “Every security guard and patrol licensee, armored car licensee, special limited guard and patrol licensee, or licensee carrying a firearm while engaged in private protective services” for “Every licensee” in subsection (h).

Legal Periodicals.

For article, “In Defense of Occupational Licensing: A Legal Practitioner’s Perspective,” see 43 Campbell L. Rev. 423 (2021).

§ 74C-11.
Probationary employees and registration of regular employees; unarmed security guard required to have registration card.

All licensees may employ unarmed security guards as probationary employees for 20 consecutive calendar days. Upon completion of the probationary period and the desire of the licensee to hire an unarmed security guard as a regular employee, the licensee shall register the employee who will be engaged in providing private protective services covered by this Chapter with the Board within 30 days after the probationary employment period ends, unless the Director, in the Director’s discretion, extends the time period, for good cause. Before a probationary employee engages in private protective services, the employee shall complete any training requirements, and the licensee shall conduct a criminal record check on the employee, as the Board deems appropriate. The licensee shall submit a list of the probationary employees to the Director on a monthly basis. The list shall include the name, address, social security number, and dates of employment of the employees.To register an employee after the probationary period ends, a licensee must give the Board the following:

Set(s) of classifiable fingerprints on standard F.B.I. applicant cards; recent photograph(s) of acceptable quality for identification; and

Statements of any criminal records obtained from the appropriate authority in each area where the employee has resided within the immediately preceding 48 months.

A security guard and patrol company may not employ an unarmed security guard in a regular position unless the guard has a registration card issued under subsection (d) of this section. A person engaged in a private protective services profession may not employ an armed security guard unless the guard has a firearm registration permit issued under

G.S. 74C-13

.

The Director shall be notified in writing of the termination of any regular employee registered under subsection (a) of this section within 10 days after the termination.

An unarmed security guard shall make application to the Director for an unarmed registration card which the Director shall issue to the applicant after receipt of the information required to be submitted by the applicant’s employer pursuant to subsection (a) of this section, and after meeting any additional requirements which the Board, in its discretion, deems to be necessary. The unarmed security guard registration card shall be in the form of a pocket card designed by the Board, shall be issued in the name of the applicant, and may have the applicant’s photograph affixed to the card. The unarmed security guard registration card shall expire one year after its date of issuance and shall be renewed every year. The Board may require all registration holders to complete continuing education courses approved by the Board before renewal of their registrations. If an unarmed registered security guard is terminated by a licensee and changes employment to another security guard and patrol company, the security guard’s registration card shall remain valid, provided the security guard pays the unarmed guard registration transfer fee to the Board and a new unarmed security guard registration card is issued. An unarmed security guard whose transfer registration application and transfer fee have been sent to the Board may work with a copy of the transfer application until the registration card is issued.

Notwithstanding the provisions of this section, a licensee may employ a person properly registered or licensed as an unarmed security guard in another state for a period not to exceed 10 days in any given month; provided the licensee, prior to employing the unarmed security guard, submits to the Director the name, address, and social security number of the unarmed guard and the name of the state of current registration or licensing, and the Director approves the employment of the unarmed guard in this State.

Repealed by Session Laws 2005-211, s. 1, effective July 20, 2005.

History.

1979, c. 818, s. 2; 1983, c. 67, s. 2; 1985, c. 597, ss. 8, 9; 1987, c. 657, ss. 4, 5; 1989, c. 759, s. 9; 2001-487, s. 64(f); 2005-211, s. 1; 2007-511, s. 6; 2009-328, s. 7.

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2005-211, s. 1, effective July 20, 2005, in the section heading, substituted “Probationary employees and registration of regular” for “Registration of permanent and temporary”; rewrote subsection (a); in subsection (b), added “in a regular position”; in subsection (c), added “regular” and “of this section” and substituted “the” for “said”; and deleted subsection (f), which read: “Notwithstanding the provisions of this section, a licensee may employ a person as an unarmed security guard for a period not to exceed 30 days in any given calendar year without registering that employee in accordance with this section; provided that the licensee submits to the Director a quarterly report, within 30 days after the end of the quarter in which the temporary employee worked, which provides the Director with the name, address, social security number, and dates of employment of such employee.”

Session Laws 2007-511, s. 6, effective October 1, 2007, in subsection (d), made minor stylistic changes, substituted “the applicant’s employer” for “his employer” and inserted “of this section” in the first sentence, substituted “affixed to the card” for “affixed thereto” in the second sentence, and inserted the fourth sentence.

Session Laws 2009-328, s. 7, effective October 1, 2009, inserted “consecutive” in the first sentence of the first paragraph of subsection (a).

§ 74C-12.
Denial, suspension, or revocation of license, registration, or permit; duty to report criminal arrests.

The Board may, after compliance with Chapter 150B of the General Statutes, deny, suspend or revoke a license, registration, or permit issued under this Chapter if it is determined that the applicant, licensee, registrant, or permit holder has done any of the following acts:

Made any false statement or given any false information in connection with any application for a license, registration, or permit or for the renewal or reinstatement of a license, registration, or permit.

Violated any provision of this Chapter.

Violated any rule adopted by the Board pursuant to the authority contained in this Chapter.

Repealed by Session Laws 1989, c. 759, s. 10.

Impersonated or permitted or aided and abetted any other person to impersonate a law enforcement officer of the United States, this State, any other state, or any political subdivision of a state.

Engaged in or permitted any employee to engage in a private protective services profession when not lawfully in possession of a valid license issued under the provisions of this Chapter.

Willfully failed or refused to render to a client service as agreed between the parties and for which compensation has been paid or tendered in accordance with the agreement of the parties.

Knowingly made any false report to the employer or client for whom information is being obtained.

Committed an unlawful breaking or entering, assault, battery, or kidnapping.

Knowingly violated or advised, encouraged, or assisted the violation of any court order or injunction in the course of business as a licensee.

Repealed by Session Laws 1989, c. 759, s. 10.

Undertaken to give legal advice or counsel or to in any way falsely represent that he or she is representing any attorney or he or she is appearing or will appear as an attorney in any legal proceeding.

Issued, delivered, or uttered any simulation of process of any nature which might lead a person to believe that such simulation — written, printed, or typed — may be a summons, warrant, writ or court process, or any pleading in any court proceeding.

Failed to make the required contribution to the Private Protective Services Education Fund or failed to maintain the certificate of liability insurance required by this Chapter.

Violated the firearm provisions set forth in this Chapter.

Repealed by Session Laws 1989, c. 759, s. 10.

Failed to notify the Director by a business entity other than a sole proprietorship licensed pursuant to this Chapter of the cessation of employment of the business entity’s qualifying agent within the time set forth in this Chapter.

Failed to obtain a substitute qualifying agent by a business entity within 30 days after its qualifying agent has ceased to serve as the business entity’s qualifying agent.

Been judged incompetent by a court having jurisdiction under Chapter 35A or former Chapter 35 of the General Statutes or committed to a mental health facility for treatment of mental illness, as defined in

G.S. 122C-3

, by a court under

G.S. 122C-271

.

Failed or refused to offer a report to a client within 30 days of the client’s written request after the client has paid for services rendered.

Been previously denied a license, registration, or permit under this Chapter or previously had a license, registration, or permit revoked for cause. The denial or revocation shall include a principal in the applicant’s business.

Engaged in a private protective services profession under a name other than the name under which the license was obtained under the provisions of this Chapter.

Divulged to any person, except as required by law, any information acquired by the license holder except at the direction of the employer or client for whom the information was obtained. A licensee may divulge to any law enforcement officer or district attorney or district attorney’s representative any information the law enforcement officer may require to investigate a criminal offense with the prior approval and consent of the client.

Fraudulently held himself or herself out as employed by or licensed by the State Bureau of Investigation or any other governmental authority.

Demonstrated intemperate habits or a lack of good moral character. The acts that are prima facie evidence of intemperate habits or lack of good moral character under G.S. 74C-8(d)(2) are prima facie evidence of the same under this subdivision.

Advertised or solicited business using a name other than that in which the license was issued.

Worn, carried, or accepted any badge or shield purporting to indicate that the person is a law enforcement officer while licensed under the provisions of this Chapter as a private investigator.

Possessed or displayed a badge or shield while providing private protective services that was not designed and approved by the Board pursuant to G.S. 74C-5(12).

Failed or refused to reasonably cooperate with the Board or its agents during an investigation of any complaint, allegation, suspicion of wrongdoing, or violation of this Chapter.

Failed to properly make any disclosure to the Board or provide documents or information required by this Chapter or rules adopted by the Board.

Engaged in conduct constituting dereliction of duty or otherwise deceived, defrauded, or harmed the public in the course of professional activities or services.

Demonstrated a lack of financial responsibility.

The denial, revocation, or suspension of a license, registration, or permit by the Board shall be in writing, be signed by the Director of the Board, and state the grounds upon which the Board decision is based. The aggrieved person shall have the right to appeal from this decision as provided in Chapter 150B of the General Statutes. The aggrieved person shall file the appeal within 60 days of receipt of the Board’s decision.

The following persons may not be issued a license under this Chapter:

A sworn court official.

A holder of a company police commission under Chapter 74E of the General Statutes.

A licensee shall report to the Board in writing within 30 days any charge, arrest for, or conviction of a misdemeanor or felony for any of the following:

Crimes that have as an essential element dishonesty, deceit, fraud, or misrepresentation.

Illegal use, possession, sale, manufacture, distribution, or transportation of a controlled substance, drug, narcotic, or alcoholic beverage.

Illegal use, carrying, or possession of a firearm.

Acts involving assault.

Acts involving unlawful breaking or entering, burglary, or larceny.

Any offense involving moral turpitude.

For purposes of this section, the term “conviction” includes the entry of a plea of guilty, a plea of nolo contendere, prayer for judgment continued, or a finding of guilt by a court of competent jurisdiction. The licensee’s failure to report a charge, arrest for, or conviction of a misdemeanor or felony is grounds for revocation of the license.

History.

1979, c. 818, s. 2; 1981, c. 807, s. 6; 1987, c. 550, s. 20; c. 657, s. 6; 1989, c. 759, s. 10; 1991 (Reg. Sess., 1992), c. 1043, s. 5; 2001-487, s. 64(g); 2007-511, s. 7; 2009-328, ss. 8, 9.

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2007-511, s. 7, effective October 1, 2007, added “duty to report criminal arrests” in the section heading; added “done any of the following acts” in subsection (a); substituted “adopted” for “promulgated” in the middle of subdivision (a)(3); added “after the client has paid for services rendered” in subdivision (a)(20); in subdivision (a)(23), substituted “the license holder” for “him” in the first sentence and “district attorney’s” for “his” in the second sentence; inserted “or herself” in subdivision (a)(24); substituted “law enforcement officer” for “private detective or private investigator” in subdivision (a)(27); added subdivision (a)(28); added the last sentence in subsection (b); added subsection (d); and made minor stylistic changes throughout the section.

Session Laws 2009-328, ss. 8 and 9, effective October 1, 2009, in subdivision (a)(13), deleted “or persons” following “a person”; in subdivision (a)(14), substituted “Education” for “Recovery”; in subdivision (a)(21), added the last sentence; in subdivision (a)(25), in the first sentence, substituted “Demonstrated intemperate habits or a lack of” for “Intemperate habits or lacks” at the beginning; added subdivisions (a)(29) through (a)(32); and in subsection (c), deleted “registration, or permit” following “license” in the introductory language.

Legal Periodicals.

For article, “In Defense of Occupational Licensing: A Legal Practitioner’s Perspective,” see 43 Campbell L. Rev. 423 (2021).

§ 74C-13.
Armed licensee or registered employee required to have firearm registration permit; firearms training.

It shall be unlawful for any person performing private protective services duties to carry a firearm in the performance of those duties without first having met the qualifications of this section and having been issued a firearm registration permit by the Board. A licensee shall register any individual carrying a firearm within 30 days of employment. Before engaging in any private protective services activity, the individual shall receive any required training prescribed by the Board.

(a1)

The following definitions apply in this section:

Armed private investigator. — A licensed private investigator who, at any time, wears, carries, or possesses a firearm in the performance of duty.

(1a)

Armed security guard. — An individual employed by a contract security company or a proprietary security organization whose principal duty is that of an armed security watchman; armed armored car service guard; armed alarm system company responder; or armed courier service who at any time wears, carries, or possesses a firearm in the performance of duty.

Contract security company. — Any person, firm, association, or corporation engaging in a private protective services profession that provides services on a contractual basis for a fee or other valuable consideration to any other person, firm, association, or corporation.

Proprietary security organization. — Any person, firm, association, or corporation or department thereof which employs security guards, alarm responders, armored car personnel, or couriers who are employed regularly and exclusively as an employee by an employer in connection with the business affairs of the employer.

It shall be unlawful for any person, firm, association, or corporation and its agents and employees to employ an armed security guard or an armed private investigator and knowingly authorize or permit the armed security guard or armed private investigator to carry a firearm during the course of performing his or her duties as an armed security guard or an armed private investigator if the Board has not issued him or her a firearm registration permit under this section or if the person, firm, association, or corporation permits an armed security guard or an armed private investigator to carry a firearm during the course of performing his or her duties whose firearm registration permit has been suspended, revoked, or has otherwise expired:

A firearm registration permit grants authority to the armed security guard, or armed private investigator, while in the performance of his or her duties or traveling directly to and from work, to carry any firearm approved by the Board and not otherwise prohibited by law. The use of any firearm not approved by the Board is prohibited.

All firearms carried by authorized armed security guards in the performance of their duties shall be owned or leased by the employer. Personally owned firearms shall not be carried by an armed security guard in the performance of his or her duties.

The applicant for a firearm registration permit shall submit an application to the Board on a form provided by the Board.

Each firearm registration permit issued under this section to an armed security guard shall be in the form of a pocket card designed by the Board and shall identify the contract security company or proprietary security organization by whom the holder of the firearm registration permit is employed. A firearm registration permit issued to an armed security guard expires one year after the date of its issuance and must be renewed annually unless the permit holder’s employment terminates before the expiration of the permit. The Board may require all permit holders to complete continuing education courses approved by the Board before renewal of their permits.

(d1)

Each firearm registration permit issued under this section to an armed private investigator shall be in the form of a pocket card designed by the Board and shall identify the name of the armed private investigator. While carrying a firearm and engaged in private protective services, the armed private investigator shall carry the firearms registration permit issued by the Board, together with valid identification, and shall disclose to any law enforcement officer that the person holds a valid permit and is carrying a firearm, whether concealed or in plain view, when approached or addressed by the law enforcement officer, and shall display both the permit and the proper identification upon the request of a law enforcement officer. A private investigator firearm registration permit expires one year from the date of issuance and shall be renewed annually. The Board may require all permit holders to complete continuing education courses approved by the Board before renewal of their permits.

If an armed security guard terminates his or her employment with the contract security company or proprietary security organization, the firearm registration permit expires and must be returned to the Board within 15 working days of the date of termination of the employee.

A contract security company or proprietary security organization shall be allowed to employ an individual for 30 days as an armed security guard pending completion of the firearms training required by this Chapter, if the contract security company or proprietary security organization obtains prior approval from the Director. The Board and the Secretary of Public Safety shall provide by rule the procedure by which an armed private investigator, a contract security company, or a proprietary security organization applicant may be issued a temporary firearm registration permit by the Director of the Board pending a determination by the Board of whether to grant or deny an applicant a firearm registration permit.

The Board may suspend, revoke, or deny a firearm registration permit if the holder or applicant has been convicted of any crime involving moral turpitude or any crime involving the illegal use, carrying, or possession of a deadly weapon or for violation of this section or rules promulgated by the Board to implement this section. The Director may summarily suspend a firearm registration permit pending resolution of charges involving the illegal use, carrying, or possession of a firearm lodged against the holder of the permit.

The Board and the Secretary of Public Safety shall establish a firearms training program for licensees and registered employees to be conducted by agencies and institutions approved by the Board and the Secretary of Public Safety. The Board and the Secretary of Public Safety may approve training programs conducted by a contract security company and the security department of a proprietary security organization, if the contract security company or security department of a proprietary security organization offers the courses listed in subdivision (1) of this subsection and if the instructors of the training program are certified trainers approved by the Board and the Secretary of Public Safety:

The basic training course approved by the Board and the Secretary of Public Safety shall consist of a minimum of four hours of classroom training which shall include all of the following:

Legal limitations on the use of hand guns and on the powers and authority of an armed security guard.

Familiarity with this section.

Range firing and procedure and hand gun safety and maintenance.

Any other topics of armed security guard training curriculum which the Board deems necessary.

An applicant for a firearm registration permit must fire a minimum qualifying score to be determined by the Board and the Secretary of Public Safety on any approved target course approved by the Board and the Secretary of Public Safety.

A firearms registrant must complete a refresher course and shall requalify on the prescribed target course prior to the renewal of his or her firearm registration permit.

The Board and the Secretary of Public Safety shall have the authority to promulgate all rules necessary to administer the provisions of this section concerning the training requirements of this section.

The Board may not issue a firearm registration permit to an applicant until the applicant’s employer submits evidence satisfactory to the Board that the applicant:

Has satisfactorily completed an approved training course.

Meets all the qualifications established by this section and by the rules promulgated to implement this section.

Is mentally and physically capable of handling a firearm within the guidelines set forth by the Board and the Secretary of Public Safety.

The Board and the Secretary of Public Safety are authorized to prescribe reasonable rules to implement this section, including rules for periodic requalification with the firearm and for the maintenance of records relating to persons issued a firearm registration permit by the Board.

All fees collected pursuant to G.S. 74C-9(e)(7) and (8) shall be expended, under the direction of the Board, for the purpose of defraying the expense of administering the firearms provisions of this Chapter.

The Board and the Secretary of Public Safety shall establish a training program for certified trainers to be conducted by agencies and institutions approved by the Board and the Secretary of Public Safety. The Board or the Secretary of Public Safety shall have the authority to promulgate all rules necessary to administer the provisions of this subsection.

The Board and the Secretary of Public Safety shall also establish renewal requirements for certified trainers. The Board may require all certified trainers to complete continuing education courses approved by the Board before renewal of their certifications.

No certified firearms trainer shall certify a licensee or registrant unless the licensee or registrant has successfully completed the firearms training requirements set out above in subsection (h) of this section.

The Board and the Secretary of Public Safety shall establish a training program for unarmed security guards to be conducted by agencies and institutions approved by the Board and the Secretary of Public Safety. The Board and the Secretary of Public Safety shall have the authority to promulgate all rules necessary to administer the provisions of this subsection.

A private investigator shall be permitted to carry a concealed weapon during the performance of his or her duties as a private investigator upon: (i) obtaining a concealed weapon permit issued pursuant to

G.S. 14-415.11

; (ii) successfully completing the firearms training course approved by the Board and the Secretary of Public Safety; and (iii) having a notation affixed to the face of the firearms registration card designating that the armed private investigator is allowed to carry a concealed weapon. A private investigator who does not carry a weapon during the course of his or her duties as a private investigator but who wishes to carry a concealed weapon while not engaged in private investigative duties shall be permitted to do so upon completion of the requirements set forth in Article 54B of Chapter 14 of the General Statutes.

History.

1979, c. 818, s. 2; 1983, c. 67, s. 3; 1989, c. 759, s. 11; 2001-487, s. 64(h); 2007-511, s. 8; 2009-328, s. 10; 2014-100, s. 17.5(b).

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2007-511, s. 8, effective October 1, 2007, rewrote this section.

Session Laws 2009-328, s. 10, effective October 1, 2009, added the last two sentences in subsection (a).

Session Laws 2014-100, s. 17.5(b), effective July 1, 2014, substituted “Secretary of Public Safety” for “Attorney General” throughout the section.

OPINIONS OF ATTORNEY GENERAL

The definition of an armed security guard

as set forth in subdivision (a)(1) includes a private investigator who carries a weapon. See opinion of Attorney General to James F. Kirk, Administrator, N.C. Private Protective Services Board, 60 N.C. Op. Att'y Gen. 12 (1990).

§ 74C-14.
[Repealed]

Repealed by Session Laws 2009-328, s. 11, effective October 1, 2009.

§ 74C-15.
Pocket identification cards issued to licensees and trainees.

Upon the issuance of a license or trainee permit, a pocket identification card of design, size, and content approved by the Board shall be issued by the Board without charge to each licensee or trainee. The holder must have this card in his possession at all times when he is on duty and working within the scope of his employment. When a licensee or trainee to whom a card has been issued terminates his position as a licensee or trainee, the card must be surrendered to the Director of the Board within 10 working days thereafter.

Repealed by Session Laws 1989, c. 759, s. 12.

History.

1979, c. 818, s. 2; 1989, c. 759, s. 12; 2001-487, s. 64(i).

§ 74C-16.
Prohibited acts.

, (b) Repealed by Session Laws 1989, c. 759, s. 13.

(c)

It shall be unlawful for anyone not licensed or registered as required under this Chapter to:

Advertise or to hold himself out to be a licensee;

Advertise or to hold himself out to perform services for which a license is required when, in fact, the individual is not licensed or registered in accordance with this Chapter.

Repealed by Session Laws 1989, c. 759, s. 13.

(d)

through (f) Repealed by Session Laws 1989, c. 759, s. 13.

History.

1979, c. 818, s. 2; 1983, c. 794, s. 5; 1987, c. 657, ss. 7, 8; 1989, c. 759, s. 13.